test/data/dictyamls/dict-gt-yamls/N-3lex_piivtas_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - piivtâs: # ok
    piivtâs+N+Sg+Nom: piivtâs
    piivtâs+N+Sg+Gen: pihtâs
    piivtâs+N+Sg+Acc: pihtâs
    piivtâs+N+Sg+Ill: pihtâsân
    piivtâs+N+Sg+Loc: pihtâsist
    piivtâs+N+Sg+Com: pihtâsáin
    piivtâs+N+Sg+Abe: pihtâsttáá
    piivtâs+N+Ess: piˊvtâsin
    piivtâs+N+Par: piˊvtâsid
    piivtâs+N+Pl+Nom: pihtâseh
    piivtâs+N+Pl+Gen: pihtâsij
    piivtâs+N+Pl+Acc: pihtâsijd
    piivtâs+N+Pl+Ill: pihtâsáid
    piivtâs+N+Pl+Loc: pihtâsijn
    piivtâs+N+Pl+Com: pihtâsijguin
    piivtâs+N+Pl+Abe: pihtâsijttáá

  Noun - kiirâs: # 
    kiirâs+N+Sg+Nom: kiirâs
    kiirâs+N+Sg+Gen: kirrâs
    kiirâs+N+Sg+Acc: kirrâs
    kiirâs+N+Sg+Ill: kirrâsân
    kiirâs+N+Sg+Loc: kirrâsist
    kiirâs+N+Sg+Com: kirrâsáin
    kiirâs+N+Sg+Abe: kirrâsttáá
    kiirâs+N+Ess: kiˊṛâsin
    kiirâs+N+Par: kiˊṛâsid
    kiirâs+N+Pl+Nom: kirrâseh
    kiirâs+N+Pl+Gen: kirrâsij
    kiirâs+N+Pl+Acc: kirrâsijd
    kiirâs+N+Pl+Ill: kirrâsáid
    kiirâs+N+Pl+Loc: kirrâsijn
    kiirâs+N+Pl+Com: kirrâsijguin
    kiirâs+N+Pl+Abe: kirrâsijttáá

  Noun - raagâs:
    raagâs+N+Sg+Nom: raagâs
    raagâs+N+Sg+Gen: raggâs
    raagâs+N+Sg+Acc: raggâs
    raagâs+N+Sg+Ill: raggâsân
    raagâs+N+Sg+Loc: raggâsist
    raagâs+N+Sg+Com: raggâsáin
    raagâs+N+Sg+Abe: raggâsttáá
    raagâs+N+Ess: raˊgâsin
    raagâs+N+Par: raˊgâsid
    raagâs+N+Pl+Nom: raggâseh
    raagâs+N+Pl+Gen: raggâsij
    raagâs+N+Pl+Acc: raggâsijd
    raagâs+N+Pl+Ill: raggâsáid
    raagâs+N+Pl+Loc: raggâsijn
    raagâs+N+Pl+Com: raggâsijguin
    raagâs+N+Pl+Abe: raggâsijttáá

  Noun - laaiđâs:
    laaiđâs+N+Sg+Nom: laaiđâs
    laaiđâs+N+Sg+Gen: laiđâs
    laaiđâs+N+Sg+Acc: laiđâs
    laaiđâs+N+Sg+Ill: laiđâsân
    laaiđâs+N+Sg+Loc: laiđâsist
    laaiđâs+N+Sg+Com: laiđâsáin
    laaiđâs+N+Sg+Abe: laiđâsttáá
    laaiđâs+N+Ess: laˊiđâsin
    laaiđâs+N+Par: laˊiđâsid
    laaiđâs+N+Pl+Nom: laiđâseh
    laaiđâs+N+Pl+Gen: laiđâsij
    laaiđâs+N+Pl+Acc: laiđâsijd
    laaiđâs+N+Pl+Ill: laiđâsáid
    laaiđâs+N+Pl+Loc: laiđâsijn
    laaiđâs+N+Pl+Com: laiđâsijguin
    laaiđâs+N+Pl+Abe: laiđâsijttáá

  Noun - skoođâs: # ok
    skoođâs+N+Sg+Nom: skoođâs
    skoođâs+N+Sg+Gen: skođđâs
    skoođâs+N+Sg+Acc: skođđâs
    skoođâs+N+Sg+Ill: skođđâsân
    skoođâs+N+Sg+Loc: skođđâsist
    skoođâs+N+Sg+Com: skođđâsáin
    skoođâs+N+Sg+Abe: skođđâsttáá
    skoođâs+N+Ess: skoˊđ̣âsin
    skoođâs+N+Par: skoˊđ̣âsid
    skoođâs+N+Pl+Nom: skođđâseh
    skoođâs+N+Pl+Gen: skođđâsij
    skoođâs+N+Pl+Acc: skođđâsijd
    skoođâs+N+Pl+Ill: skođđâsáid
    skoođâs+N+Pl+Loc: skođđâsijn
    skoođâs+N+Pl+Com: skođđâsijguin
    skoođâs+N+Pl+Abe: skođđâsijttáá

  Noun - vaajâs:
    vaajâs+N+Sg+Nom: vaajâs
    vaajâs+N+Sg+Gen: vaijâs
    vaajâs+N+Sg+Acc: vaijâs
    vaajâs+N+Sg+Ill: vaijâsân
    vaajâs+N+Sg+Loc: vaijâsist
    vaajâs+N+Sg+Com: vaijâsáin
    vaajâs+N+Sg+Abe: vaijâsttáá
    vaajâs+N+Ess: vaˊijâsin
    vaajâs+N+Par: vaˊijâsid
    vaajâs+N+Pl+Nom: vaijâseh
    vaajâs+N+Pl+Gen: vaijâsij
    vaajâs+N+Pl+Acc: vaijâsijd
    vaajâs+N+Pl+Ill: vaijâsáid
    vaajâs+N+Pl+Loc: vaijâsijn
    vaajâs+N+Pl+Com: vaijâsijguin
    vaajâs+N+Pl+Abe: vaijâsijttáá

  Noun - spääilih: # MLO, ok
    spääilih+N+Sg+Nom: spääilih
    spääilih+N+Sg+Gen: späilih
    spääilih+N+Sg+Acc: späilih
    spääilih+N+Sg+Ill: späilihân
    spääilih+N+Sg+Loc: späilihist
    spääilih+N+Sg+Com: späiliháin
    spääilih+N+Sg+Abe: spääilihttáá
    spääilih+N+Ess: späilihin
    spääilih+N+Par: späilihid
    spääilih+N+Pl+Nom: späiliheh
    spääilih+N+Pl+Gen: späilihij
    spääilih+N+Pl+Acc: späilihijd
    spääilih+N+Pl+Ill: späiliháid
    spääilih+N+Pl+Loc: späilihijn
    spääilih+N+Pl+Com: späilihijguin
    spääilih+N+Pl+Abe: späilihijttáá
